Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,215
Reckless driving; first offense; penalty.

Every person convicted of reckless driving shall, upon a first conviction, be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1935, c. 134, § 3, p. 485;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,100;

Laws 1943, c. 99, § 1, p. 339;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,107;

Laws 1947, c. 148, § 3(2), p. 410;

Laws 1955, c. 154, § 1, p. 455;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,107.01;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.02;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 311;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 11.

Applicability of statute to private property, see section 60-6,108.